Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. From the funds appropriated to the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services in Enrolled Senate Bill No. 1177
of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature, the sum of One
Million Nine Hundred Twenty Thousand Dollars ($1,920,000.00) shall
be used to provide for the Pay for Success program. The Office of
Management and Enterprise Services shall transfer the sum of Seven
Hundred Twenty Thousand Dollars ($720,000.00) to the Criminal
Justice Pay for Success Revolving Fund, created in Section 510.8c of
Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and the sum of One Million Two
Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,200,000.00) to the Pay for Success
Innovation Fund, created in Section 9010.5 of Title 62 of the
Oklahoma Statutes.

SECTION 2. Of the amount allocated for the Pay for Success
program in Section 1 of this act, seventy-five percent (75%) shall
be utilized by the Office of Management and Enterprise Services in
equal amounts for municipalities of the state with populations of
three hundred fifty thousand (350,000) or more as determined by the
latest Federal Decennial Census.
SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated to the Central
Purchasing Contract Database Revolving Fund, established in Enrolled
House Bill No. 3415 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma
Legislature, from any monies not otherwise appropriated from the
General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars
($500,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary to carry out
the provisions of Enrolled House Bill No. 3415 of the 2nd Session of
the 60th Oklahoma Legislature.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 5. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1167 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1167 Page 3